Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 13 Ad Valorem Taxation
§ 39-13-111.
Distribution.

The following shall apply to the distribution of tax collections:

The county treasurer shall keep accurate records of taxes collected for each governmental entity for which a tax levy is made pursuant to W.S. 39-13-104(k) and shall pay the taxes collected to the treasurer of each governmental unit or settle accounts with the county commissioners as hereafter provided. Prior to any payment, the county may deduct and credit to the county treasury any extraordinary costs including out of county court costs and associated attorney fees, as certified by the board of county commissioners, that the county incurred in order to collect any portion of the tax:

On the first day of each month in the case of cities, towns, irrigation districts, drainage districts, county libraries and the state and statewide levies. One-half percent (.5%) shall be deducted from payments to cities and towns and credited to the county treasury as reimbursement for county expenses in collecting taxes for the city or town;

On November 25, May 25 and when the board of county commissioners requires, settle county accounts with the board of county commissioners;

To school districts as provided by W.S.

21-13-207

;

On the second Monday of each month including all interest received in the case of community colleges;

On November 10, January 10 and May 10 for all other governmental entities.

Upon sale of property for the nonpayment of taxes, the proceeds thereof shall be distributed as follows:

The portion attributable to school district levies is payable to the proper school district;

The portion attributable to a levy by a city or town is payable to the proper city or town;

The balance is payable to the county general fund.

The county treasurer shall credit all taxes collected from rail car companies to a separate account and after the regular state, county and school district levies are made, distribute them in the same manner property taxes are distributed. To determine the entitlement to the state, county and school districts the county treasurer shall apportion the taxes to the various school districts through which the rail cars may have operated on the ratio that main track mileage in each school district bears to the total main track mileage within the county.

If taxes are paid under protest to the extent of and due to an appeal pending before the board or any court of competent jurisdiction, the county treasurer shall deposit that protested amount under appeal in an interest bearing escrow account and withhold distribution until a final decision on the appeal has been rendered. To the extent the taxpayer prevails in the appeal, the county treasurer shall refund that amount under appeal, plus interest earned thereon, to the taxpayer within thirty (30) days from the day the final decision is rendered. If the taxpayer pays to the county an amount in excess of the protested amount under appeal, the excess shall be distributed as provided by law.

If a county is unable to collect some or all of the tax due because of nonpayment by a taxpayer, through bankruptcy or otherwise, the county shall not be liable to any other governmental entity for any amount of the tax that is not collected from the taxpayer.

Taxes collected pursuant to W.S.

39-13-113

shall be distributed by the county treasurer on or before the tenth day of the month following the month of receipt. Taxes collected following final reconciliation of the taxes under W.S.

39-13-113

(b) shall be distributed by the county treasurer on or before the tenth day of the month following the month of collection.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2018 ch. 1, § 1, effective March 7, 2018; 2020 ch. 142, § 2, effective March 24, 2020; 2021 ch. 28, § 1, effective February 9, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to actions to enjoin illegal collection of or to recover back taxes, see §

39-13-109

.

As to receipt and disbursement of public funds, see §

9-4-101

et seq.

The 2005 amendment

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the trust and agency fund” in (a)(iii).

The 2018 amendment,

in (a)(i), added the last sentence; added (c); and made a related stylistic change.

Laws 2018, ch. 1, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2018.

The 2020 amendment,

added (d).

Laws 2020, ch. 142, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.

The 2021 amendment,

rewrote (d), which read, "Taxes collected pursuant to W.S.

39-13-113

shall be distributed as provided in this section following final reconciliation of the taxes under W.S.

39-13-113

(b)."

Laws 2021, ch. 28, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 9, 2021.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Illegal and erroneous taxes. —

The correct interpretation of this section is that it relates to illegal and also erroneous taxes. Essentially, when the state board of equalization recognized the tax previously paid was erroneous (or illegal), the process should lead to appropriate adjustments both in favor, and to the disadvantage, of the taxpayer. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 876 P.2d 989,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1994).

Irregularity of collection doesn't require refund. —

Under this section, mere irregularities in the method of collecting a tax are not sufficient to require a refunding order, but it must appear that the tax itself is erroneous or illegal — that is, that it is not equitably due from the taxpayer. Carton v. Board of Comm'rs, 10 Wyo. 416, 69 P. 1013,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1902).

Deposit of disputed interest, penalty, not required. —

The county treasurer could not require the deposit of disputed interest and penalty, plus taxes, in order to establish an interest bearing escrow account pursuant to subsection former § 39-4-101(d). Thunder Basin Coal Co. v. Study, 866 P.2d 1288,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1994).

Overvaluation by state tax officials resulting from error of judgment

will not support claim of discrimination, but there must be something equivalent to fraudulent purpose or intent to disregard fundamental principle of uniformity before collection of part of tax will be enjoined. Rowley v. Chicago & N. R. Co., 293 U.S. 102, 55 S. Ct. 55, 79 L. Ed. 222, 1934 U.S. LEXIS 8 (U.S.), reh'g denied, 293 U.S. 632, 55 S. Ct. 211, 79 L. Ed. 717, 1934 U.S. LEXIS 441 (U.S. 1934).

When commissioners deemed in default. —

Under this section, the board of commissioners will not be deemed to be in default of its duty until application has been made to it by the taxpayer, and has been refused. Carton v. Board of Comm'rs, 10 Wyo. 416, 69 P. 1013,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1902).

Acceptance of tax money. —

While taxes on taxpayer's personalty remain unpaid, which are lien on his real estate, tax collector is not obliged to accept tax due on the realty, since receipt would be written evidence that all taxes against realty had been paid. Ricketts v. Crewdson, 13 Wyo. 284, 79 P. 1042,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 13 Wyo. 284, 79 P. 1042,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1905).

Oil company was entitled to a tax refund

of taxes paid to the county on oil production subsequently determined to be the property of the Atlantic Richfield Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 569 P.2d 1267,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 318

(Wyo. 1977).

Taxpayer had no enforceable right to interest on refund

he was due for excess property taxes paid between 1982 and 1987, where the statutes did not authorize the award of interest on such refunds and he had not given the county any notice of his claim. In re Black, 775 P.2d 484,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1989).

Legislative history. —

See Atlantic Richfield Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 569 P.2d 1267,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 318

(Wyo. 1977).

Predecessor statute and former version of § 39-3-203 distinguished. —

See Atlantic Richfield Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 569 P.2d 1267,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 318

(Wyo. 1977).

Quoted

in

Platte County Sch. Dist. No. 1 v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 638 P.2d 1276,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1982); Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994); Campbell County Sch. Dist. No. 1 v. Board of County Comm'rs, 884 P.2d 960,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For article, “Defeating Tax Levies to Recover Excess Taxes,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 233.

For note, “Mineral Taxation—When is a Refund of Ad Valorem Mineral Taxes Appropriate?,” see XXX Land & Water L. Rev. 129 (1994).

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, (2d Ed.) §
193.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 39-13-112.
Property taxation of certain helium.

As used in this section:

“Helium” means helium which is a component of a natural gas stream leased by the United States to any lessee pursuant to the Mineral Leasing Act of 1920, 30 U.S.C. section 181. All other helium shall be subject to ad valorem taxation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

All other definitions in W.S.

39-13-101

and

39-14-201

are incorporated herein by reference to the extent that they may apply.

Administration; confidentiality: The department shall annually value and assess helium production at its fair market value for taxation in accordance with the applicable provisions of W.S.

39-13-102

.

Taxable event: There is levied an ad valorem tax on the value of the gross product produced, as provided in article 15, section 3 of the Wyoming constitution, on the helium produced in this state. The tax imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to all other taxes imposed by law.

Basis of tax: Helium shall be valued for taxation as natural gas as provided in W.S. 39-14-203(b).

Taxpayer: Any person producing helium; or, to the extent of his interest ownership, any person owning or producing an interest in the helium, by lease or other contract right, is liable for the payment of the ad valorem taxes together with any penalties and interest, provided however, that helium shall be subject to the ad valorem tax only once.

Tax rate: Helium shall be subject to the ad valorem tax rate as provided in W.S.

39-13-104

.

Exemptions: The exemptions from taxation provided by W.S.

39-13-105

shall apply to helium.

Compliance; collection procedures: The ad valorem tax related provisions of W.S.

39-13-107

shall apply to helium production.

Enforcement: All ad valorem tax related provisions of W.S.

39-13-108

shall apply to helium production.

Taxpayer remedies: All ad valorem tax related provisions of W.S.

39-13-109

shall apply to helium production.

Distribution: Ad valorem tax revenues from helium production shall be distributed as provided by W.S.

39-13-111

.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 153, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

Laws 2009, ch. 153, § 2, provides: “(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) There are in Wyoming extensive reserves of natural gas which contain helium, much of which underlie lands which are owned by the United States, and the leases of the natural gas by the federal government under laws which are now obsolete and outdated operate in a fashion which allows the producer of the helium to avoid ad valorem taxation, but retain the right to produce, market and sell the helium and retain revenue from the sale of the helium;

“(ii) All helium producers in this state should be taxed in the same manner;

“(iii) Under certain unique circumstances, more particularly described in

Department of Revenue v. Exxon Mobil Corporation

, 162 P.3d 515 (Wyo. 2007), natural gas is leased to an oil and gas producer, reserving the title to the helium component of the natural gas in the United States; however, the producer takes possession of the natural gas, transports, processes, extracts the helium from the gas stream and sells the helium, and the title to the helium first passes to the producer downstream of the point of valuation, thus allowing helium to avoid ad valorem taxation;

“(iv) These circumstances occur in cases in which the federal lease is issued pursuant to the Mineral Leasing Act of 1920, 30 U.S.C. section 181, which requires that the United States reserve “the ownership of and the right to extract helium from all gas produced from lands leased or otherwise granted,” and title to the helium is passed pursuant to a sale and purchase agreement, or contract, as opposed to a federal lease;

“(v) From and after the effective date of the Helium Privatization Act of 1996, 50 U.S.C. section 167a, the United States may lease helium as it does any other mineral rendering helium production subject to state taxation; however, the value of the helium gross product removed, extracted, produced and sold which is produced in the natural gas stream leased pursuant to the Mineral Leasing Act of 1920, avoids ad valorem taxation, and thus is treated differently than other components of natural gas produced within the state of Wyoming;

“(vi) Production of helium containing natural gas leased pursuant to the Mineral Leasing Act of 1920 should be treated similarly to the production of helium leased pursuant to the Helium Privatization Act of 1996, or helium produced from nonfederal lands with regard to ad valorem taxation;

“(vii) It is the intent of the legislature that the tax be imposed on either the person who owns the mineral, or the person who owns the right to produce, remove or sell the mineral by lease or other contractual right, but that no mineral be subject to double ad valorem taxation. The Wyoming constitution, article 15, section 3, provides that the minerals which are “or may be produced” shall be taxed on the “gross product thereof, as may be prescribed by law.” Under certain unique circumstances, more particularly described in

Department of Revenue v. Exxon Mobil Corporation

, 162 P.3d 515 (Wyo. 2007), certain helium produced avoids ad valorem taxation because it is produced by contract and not a lease, which decision does not reflect the intent of the legislature with regard to helium;

“(viii) Helium within natural gas leased pursuant to the Mineral Leasing Act of 1920 is a valuable deposit, but its production avoids taxation in violation of the requirements of Wyoming constitution, article 15, section 3, and taxation statutes enacted pursuant thereto;

“(ix) It is the intent of the legislature that the state of Wyoming should encourage the United States government to lease helium as it does other minerals.”

§ 39-13-113.
Monthly payment of ad valorem tax on gross product of mineral production.

Commencing with mineral and mine production on January 1, 2020, this section shall govern the payment of all ad valorem taxes on the value of the gross product of minerals and mine products, hereafter referred to as the “ad valorem tax on mineral production”. Any provisions of this title related to the ad valorem tax on mineral production that do not conform to the processes and procedures set forth in this section are superseded by this section to the extent the procedures conflict with this section.

Except as provided in this section, all mineral and mine producers in the state shall report ad valorem mineral production to the department on or before the twenty-fifth day of the second month following the month of production and shall pay the ad valorem tax on mineral production for each county on a monthly basis as indicated on an invoice sent by the department. The department shall invoice each producer on or before the tenth day of the month following the report. Payments shall be due and payable to the department on or before the twenty-fifth day of the third month following the month of production. Payments under this subsection shall not be less than the amount calculated by the department by applying the mill levy rate established by the county in the immediately preceding year to the value of the gross product of minerals and mine products produced each month. Annually, on or before September 20, the county treasurer shall send a written statement to each taxpayer by mail at his last known address or, if offered by the county and upon request of the taxpayer, by electronic transmission, of any tax due or overpayment received after applying the amount the county has received from that taxpayer through monthly payments under this section by reconciling those payments with the applicable mill levy rate for that production year, itemized as to property description, assessed value and applicable mill levies. Failure to send notice, or to demand payment of taxes, does not invalidate any taxes due. The taxpayer shall reconcile the amount indicated on the notice as follows:

Collection and distribution. Monthly and annual payments of the ad valorem tax on mineral production shall be collected by the department on behalf of each county. The department shall properly account for the payments received and distribute the payments monthly to the county treasurer. Upon distribution of funds to counties under this subsection the amount shall be proportionally distributed by the county treasurer to each taxing entity within the county as provided in W.S.

39-13-111

.

If a taxpayer’s liability for severance tax as imposed under chapter 14 of this title is less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) for the preceding calendar year, the monthly payment requirements for the ad valorem tax on mineral production under this chapter are waived and the taxpayer shall report to the department on or before the twenty-fifth day of February of the year following the production year and shall pay the ad valorem tax on mineral production annually as indicated on an invoice sent by the department. The department shall invoice each producer on or before the tenth day of the month following the report. The payment shall be due and payable on March 25 of the year following the year of production. Annual payments shall be calculated by the department by applying the mill levy rate established by the county commissioners in the production year to the value of the gross product of minerals and mine products produced in the applicable year. Annual payments made under this subsection shall be paid to the department and deposited with the applicable county treasurer as provided in subsection (c) of this section and reconciled as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

Failure to make payments at the time they are due and payable under this section shall subject the taxpayer to the enforcement provisions of W.S. 30-5-104(d)(x) and

39-13-108

and shall also be subject to enforcement as follows:

If the report and payment of tax required under this section is not provided, the department shall value the property from the best information available to determine the fair market value of the property;

If a taxpayer producing valuable deposits fails to pay the taxes when due, the department shall file a notice of lien on behalf of the applicable county pursuant to W.S.

39-13-108

(d)(vi);

Taxes due together with interest, penalties and costs shall be collectible by the department or county by appropriate judicial proceedings.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section or any other provision of law, upon receiving an application from a taxpayer a county may enter into an agreement with the taxpayer to accept payments for the ad valorem tax on mineral production under the processes and procedures in place prior to the effective date of this section, subject to the following:

Prior to entering into any agreement under this subsection, the county shall:

Establish uniform eligibility criteria and an application process;

Conduct at least one (1) public meeting related to the proposed agreement. The county shall notify all taxing authorities that receive any taxes that may be impacted by the agreement of the meeting at least fourteen (14) days prior to the meeting.

Upon entering into any agreement under this subsection, the county shall notify the department;

Upon receipt of notice from a county under this subsection, the department shall exempt the taxpayer from the provisions of this section and the taxpayer shall be subject to all processes, procedures and requirements in place prior to the effective date of this section;

No taxpayer shall be eligible for an agreement under this subsection for mineral production from any property acquired on or after the effective date of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) and (f) of this section, estimated monthly ad valorem tax payments shall first be due under this section beginning with production on January 1, 2022. The ad valorem tax on mineral production from calendar years 2020 and 2021 shall be paid as provided in this subsection. Fifty percent (50%) of taxes due for production from calendar year 2020 shall be due on and after September 1, 2021 and payable to the counties on and after November 10, 2021. The remaining fifty percent (50%) of the taxes due for production from calendar year 2020, unless the entire tax due for production from calendar year 2020 is paid by December 31, 2021, and all taxes due from production in calendar year 2021 shall be paid through deferred payments as provided in this subsection. The total amount of deferred taxes due under this subsection shall be calculated by the department and the applicable counties. The taxpayer shall make an additional payment for deferred taxes under this subsection on December 1 of each year beginning in 2023 equal to eight percent (8%) of the total amount calculated under this subsection until the total amount has been paid. Each county shall track payments due under this subsection and shall send an invoice to each taxpayer not later than October 1 of each year beginning in 2023 of the deferred payment due under this subsection for that year. Timely deferred payments made in accordance with this subsection shall not be subject to penalties or interest. The following shall apply to deferred payments under this subsection:

If a taxpayer fails to make one (1) deferred payment by December 1 of the year the payment is due under this subsection, all applicable penalties and interest shall be calculated from the date of the missed payment;

If a taxpayer fails to make a second deferred payment under this subsection, the total remaining amount of deferred taxes due under this subsection shall be immediately due and payable with penalties and interest calculated from the date of the second missed payment;

If a taxpayer subject to deferred payments under this subsection sells, divests or liquidates its producing mineral assets in a county or counties such that the taxpayer is no longer required to file a monthly severance tax report with the department pursuant to chapter 14 of this title, the total remaining amount of deferred taxes due under this subsection for that county or counties shall be due and payable to the applicable county treasurer on or before the twenty-fifth day of the third month following the month the taxpayer sold, divested, or liquidated its producing mineral assets. If a taxpayer fails to make a deferred payment under this paragraph, all applicable penalties and interest shall be calculated from the date of the missed payment;

Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a taxpayer from voluntarily remitting to the counties any remaining portion of nondelinquent deferred taxes without penalty.

History.

2020 ch. 142, § 1, effective March 24, 2020; 2021 ch. 28, § 1, effective February 9, 2021; 2022 ch. 53, § 1, effective March 11, 2022; 2022 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendment,

substituted “monthly” for “promptly in the course of ordinary business” in the second sentence of (c); and added (g).

Laws 2021, ch. 28, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 9, 2021.

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 53, § 1, in (b), rewrote the first sentence, which read, “Except as provided in this section, all mineral and mine producers in the state shall report and pay the ad valorem tax on mineral production for each county on a monthly basis,” added the second sentence, substituted “third” for “second” in the present third sentence, substituted “department” for “taxpayer” in the present fourth sentence; in (d), added “to the department on or before the twenty-fifth day of February of the year following the production year,” added “shall” preceding “pay the ad valorem,” substituted “indicated on an invoice sent by the department” for “provided in this subsection,” added the second sentence, in the present third sentence, deleted “annual report and” preceding “payment shall,” substituted “March” for “February,” in the present fourth sentence, substituted “department” for “taxpayer,” deleted “, along with any adjustments made in accordance with law and reported by the county to the department by January 15 of the year following the production year,” following “production year”; in (g), in the fourth sentence, deleted “Unless the entire tax due for production from calendar year 2020 is paid by December 31, 2021” at the beginning, added “, unless the entire tax due for production from calendar year 2020 is paid by December 31, 2021,” added “through deferred payments,” substituted “deferred” for 2020 and 2021 remaining” in the fifth sentence, added “for deferred taxes under this subsection” in the sixth sentence, added the seventh sentence, added “deferred” in the present eighth sentence, in the present ninth sentence, substituted “The following shall apply to deferred” for “If a taxpayer fails to make timely,” deleted “, all applicable penalties and interest shall be calculated from the date the tax would have been paid if monthly payments began January 1, 2020” at the end; added (g)(i) through (g)(iv); and made related changes.

Laws 2022, ch. 53, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2022.

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, added “30-5-104(d)(x) and” in the introductory language of (e).

Effective date.
—

Laws 2020, ch. 142, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.